Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.108.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Eligible student" or "student" means an American Indian who is a student who demonstrates financial need, as defined in RCW 28B.92.030, who is a resident student, as defined by RCW 28B.15.012(2), who is a full-time student at an institution of higher education, and who promises to use his or her education to benefit other American Indians.

(2) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a college or university in the state of Washington which is accredited by an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the council for higher education.

(3) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

[ 2019 c 406 s 34. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 191; 2004 c 275 s 69; 1991 c 228 s 10; 1990 c 287 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.